src-fst-phonology.twolc.md
* *poi6ka^Por^A0>i2>ne*
* *poik000>i>ne*
* ★*poi6ka^Por^A0>i2>ne* (is not standard language)
* ★*poika00>i>ne* (is not standard language)
* ★*poi6ka^Por^A0>i2>ne* (is not standard language)
* ★*poiki00>i>ne* (is not standard language)

* ★*poi6ka^A2I>i2>n* (is not standard language)
* ★*poika0>i>n* (is not standard language)

* *sop0i>^V*
* *soppi>i*

* *vuot0e>i2>^V>n*
* *vuoss0>i>i>n*

* ★*vuot0e>i2>^V>n* (is not standard language)
* ★*vuott0>i>i>n* (is not standard language)

* *housu>i2>le*
* *housu>i>le*

* *hirt0e>i2>^V*
* *hirss0>i>i*

* ★*hirt0e>i2>^V* (is not standard language)
* ★*hirtt0>i>i* (is not standard language)

* *ant0a>^Vt*
* *antta>at*

* *ant0a>^V*
* *antta>a*

* *ant0a>^V>v^A*
* *antta>a>va*

* *ant0a>^V>v^At*
* *antta>a>vat*

* *aik0a^Por>^V*
* *aikka0>a*

* *kiv0e>i2>^V*
* *kivv0>i>i*

**Tests:**
* *kal0a>^V*
* *kalla>a*
* *kuv0a>^V*
* *kuvva>a*
* *suome>^V*
* *suome>e*
* *lauk0e>^V*
* *laukke>e*
* *tek0e>^V*
* *tekke>e*
* *kat0o>^V>t*
* *katto>o>t*
* *kal0a^Por^AO>i2*
* *kallo00>i*
* *kir0o>^V>t*
* *kirro>o>t*
* *san0a^AO>i2*
* *sanno0>i*
* *jout0u>^V*
* *jouttu>u*
* *puh0u>^V*
* *puhhu>u*
* *näk0y>^V*
* *näkky>y*
* *lev0y>^V*
* *levvy>y*
* *näk0ö>^V*
* *näkkö>ö*
* *pör0ö>^V*
* *pörrö>ö*
* ★*perin0ö^WG>n* (is not standard language)
* ★*perinnö0>n* (is not standard language)
* *tiet0ä>^Vt*
* *tiettä>ät*
* *as0u>^Vt*
* *assu>ut*
* *el0ä>^V*
* *ellä>ä*
* *jalk0a>^V*
* *jalkka>a*
* *järk0e>^V*
* *järkke>e*
* *murt0o>^V*
* *murtto>o*
* *polk0u>^V*
* *polkku>u*
* *särk0y>^V*
* *särkky>y*
* *lämp0ö>^V*
* *lämppö>ö*
* *pölk0ä>^V*
* *härk0ä>^V*
* *härkkä>ä*
* *kerk0i>^Vn*
* *kerkki>in*
* *lauk0e>i7s*
* *laukke>is*
* *särk0y>i7s*
* *särkky>is*

Rule: **o:0**

Rule: **o:0**

Rule: **o:0**

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/phonology.twolc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-fkv/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc)</small>

---
